Wyoming, session 2026, SF0010.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 7-11-308 is created to read:
7-11-308. Duties of the department of health as to
designated facilities other than the state hospital.
The department of health may designate county detention
facilities as qualified to provide security, examination or
treatment to accused persons under this act and enter into
contracts with those designated facilities for the
security, examination or treatment of accused persons under
this act. The department may enter into contracts with
counties under this section.
Section 2. W.S. 1-39-103(a)(iv) by creating a new
subparagraph (J), 1-39-109(a), 1-39-110(a) and
7-11-301(a)(ii) and (iv) are amended to read:
1-39-103. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(iv) "Public employee":
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0010
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(J) Includes persons employed by or
contracted with facilities as defined by W.S.
7-11-301(a)(ii) that provide security, examination or
treatment of accused persons housed in county detention
facilities under W.S. 7-11-308.
1-39-109. Liability; medical facilities.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section and except for services provided under W.S.
7-11-308, a governmental entity is liable for damages
resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death or property
damage caused by the negligence of public employees while
acting within the scope of their duties in the operation of
any public hospital or in providing public outpatient
health care.
1-39-110. Liability; health care providers.
(a) Except for services provided under W.S. 7-11-308,
a governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
bodily injury, wrongful death or property damage caused by
the medical malpractice of health care providers who are
employees of the governmental entity, including contract
physicians, physician assistants, nurses, optometrists and
dentists who are providing a service for state institutions
or county jails, while acting within the scope of their
duties.
7-11-301. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(ii) "Facility" means the Wyoming state hospital
or other facility designated by the court which or the
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0010
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
department of health that can adequately provide for the
security, examination or treatment of the accused. A
"facility" shall include a county jail that is subject to a
written contractual agreement under W.S. 7-11-308;
(iv) "This act" means W.S. 7-11-301 through
7-11-307 7-11-308.
Section 3. There is appropriated five million dollars
($5,000,000.00) from the general fund to the department of
health for purposes of implementing this act. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning July 1,
2026 and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028. This general fund appropriation shall decrease by one
dollar ($1.00) for every one dollar ($1.00) of funds
appropriated in 2026 House Bill 0001 or 2026 Senate File
0001, as enacted into law, for this purpose. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
included in the standard budget of the department of health
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 4. The department of health shall report to
the joint judiciary interim committee by October 1, 2027 on
the designation of county detention facilities and the
utilization and implementation of contracts with those
facilities as authorized under W.S. 7-11-308, created by
this act.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0010
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4